src-fst-morphology-affixes-pronouns.lexc.md
# Skolt Saami Pronoun Morphology 

The lexicon *PRON_*, which is actually not needed, as pronouns get +Pron tag earlier.

* +Nom:ij		K ;  mij, tij, sij
* +Gen:ij	      K ;  mij, tij, sij
* +Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:iʹjji    K ;  miʹjji, tiʹjji, siʹjji
* +Acc:iʹjjid	      K ;  miʹjjid, tiʹjjid, siʹjjid
* +Ill:iʹjjid	      K ;  miʹjjid, tiʹjjid, siʹjjid
* +Loc:eeʹst	      K ;  meeʹst, teeʹst, seeʹst
* +Com:ijvuiʹm     K ;  mijvuiʹm, tijvuiʹm, sijvuiʹm
* +Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:iʹjjivuiʹm     K ;  miʹjjivuiʹm, tiʹjjivuiʹm, siʹjjivuiʹm
* +Abe:ijtää	      K ;  mijtää, tijtää, sijtää
* +Abe+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg:iʹjjitää	K ;  miʹjjitää, tiʹjjitää, siʹjjitää

# Pronouns

Pointing to all the pronominal subgroups

* LEXICON Pronoun 
*  Demonstrative ; 
*  Interrogative ; 
*  Relative ;	 kååʹtt, mii

## Personal pronouns

Splitting according to person

## Demonstrative pronouns

* LEXICON Demonstrative 
* tõt+Pron+Dem:t  	TOTDEM ;  The Epsilon has been removed 2015-05-13

* LEXICON SHORTDEM 

* LEXICON LONGDEM 

* LEXICON TOTDEM  

* LEXICON TIET-AA 

* LEXICON -AA 

## INDEFINITE PRONOUNS

## REFLEXIVE PRONOUNS

jiõčč:ji

Completion needed 2015-09-19

## Interrogative pronouns
**LEXICON PRON-INTERR_** is referred to from the xml file, hence does not assign **+Pron** tag.
* +Interr: # ;

* LEXICON Interrogative  is referred to from `pronouns.lexc`, hence assigns **+Pron** tag.

* LEXICON Indefinite 

* LEXICON Distributive 

* LEXICON MK 

* LEXICON MK-long  :mõõ :ǩeä

* LEXICON MK-short  :mõ :ǩeä

* LEXICON M-low-short  :mâ

* LEXICON K-low-short  :ǩeä

* LEXICON MK-low-short  :mâ :ǩeä

* LEXICON MK-low-long  :mââ :ǩeä

* LEXICON INDEF-MK 

* LEXICON INDEF-MK-long 

* LEXICON INDEF-MK-short  :mõ :ǩeä

* LEXICON INDEF-M-low-short  :mâ

* LEXICON INDEF-K-low-short  :ǩeä

* LEXICON INDEF-MK-low-short 

* LEXICON INDEF-MK-low-long 

* LEXICON DISTR-MK 

* LEXICON DISTR-MK-long 

* LEXICON DISTR-MK-short  :mõ :ǩeä

* LEXICON DISTR-M-low-short  :mâ

* LEXICON DISTR-K-low-short  :ǩeä

* LEXICON DISTR-MK-low-short 

* LEXICON DISTR-MK-low-long 

### SPATIAL PRONOUNS

### MISC

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc)</small>
